translate/lexd/n.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasN
wаху̊н:вахан
wийод:вид
wузбакисту̊н:узбекистан
wêδ:арык
wêδ:канал
wêδ-гāл:край_арыка
wêδак:канавка
wêδцак:канава
wêб:сноп
wêб:сноп
wêб-вӯндак:жгут
wêбак:вязанка
wêбак:снопик
wêбен:сноп
wêбхел:сноп
wêбхемц:мякина_от_снопов
wêбӣҷ:крайний_бык_в_запряжке_во_время_молотьбы
wêзнак:лодыжка
wêпц:моль
wêпц:моль
wêпцак:моль
wêх:корень
wêх:пожитки
wêх:корень
wêхаканд:корчевание
wā́т-wā́т:немота
wāдā:обещание
wāдā:время
wāдā:обещание
wāдā:время
wāдагāр:тот
wāдух:дурной_запах
wāз:проповедь
wāз:агитация
wāз:проповедь
wāзāн:глубина
wāзāн:глубокое_место
wāзиӡ:плавание
wāзӣҷ:пловец
wāзӣҷак:водомерка
wāлек:ответное_приветствие
wāм:душевное_состояние
wāм:эпилепсия
wāм:злой_дух
wāмдор:эпилептик
wāн:ива
wāн:ива
wāн-бун:ивовый_корень
wāрвиӡ:кипение
wāрг:ягненок
wāрг:ягненок
wāрг-биц:овечка
wāрг-бу̊ст:овчина
wāрг-буц:ягненок
wāрг-ҷӣц:помещение_для_ягнят
wāфиӡ:тканье
wāфӣҷ:ткач
wāши:варвар
wāшигари:дикость
wāшиги:дикость
wāғас:крик
wāғаст:крик
wāғдирам:душераздирающий_крик
wāғдируц:страшный_крик
wāғӣҷ:плакса
wāқм:скиталец
wāқмеҷ:скиталец
wāқми:скиталец
wāҷ:долг
wāҷ:причина
wāҷ:долг
wа́рза-wа́рз:блеск
wа́сли:соединение
wаδак:кукла
wаδак-биц:куколка
wаδак-бицак:куколка
wаδак-бози:игра_в_куклы
wаδор:холм
wабо:мор
wагу̊н:вагон
wадагāр:тот
wаз:прямая_форма_личн_мест_го_л_ед_ч_я
wазāн:глубина
wазийат:положение
wазик:прямая_форма_личн_мест_го_л_ед_ч_я
wазм:авторитет
wазм:вес
wазмини:вес
wазмини:тягость
wазмини:вес
wазн:авторитет
wазн:вес
wазорат:министерство
wазӣр:везир
wазӣр:министр
wазӣр:тот
wазӣр:везир
wазӣри:обязанности_министра
wазӣри:хитрость
wазӣфā:долг
wазӣфā:должность
wазӣфā:задание
wазӣфā:должность
wазӣфā:обязанность
wазӣфадори:долг
wайру̊нā:развалины
wайру̊нā:хижина
wайру̊нги:разрушение
wакӣл:свидетель
wакӣл:уполномоченный
wакӣл:представитель
wалāмат:жена_духовного_лица_шо
wалāмат:участник_танца_бопирак
wаласт:блеск
wалкат:масленка_из_коры_дерева
wаллāамат:молодая_знатная_женщина
wаллāмат:жена_духовного_лица_шо
wаллāмат:участник_танца_бопирак
wарāқ:лист_бумаги
wарδêwӡ:кожура
wарδāн:навой
wарδāн:навой
wарδаwах̌:болтовня
wарδу̊нбирух̌:обрезки
wарθ-анҷӣц:выкуп_за_выход_из_кладовой
wарθ-анҷӣц:шутливый_выкуп_за_пропуск_хозяйки_в_кладовую
wарам:опухоль
wарам:опухоль
wарақ:страница
wарг-бу̊ст:овчина
wардӣшк:название_растения_с_красным_цветком
wарзаст:блеск
wарзах̌:привычка
wарзих̌:привычка
wармāк:род_лесной_ивы
wарнāқ:щель
wарх̌:юган
wарх̌:название_горной_травы
wарх̌-тāжӣҷ:возчик_югана
wарх̌-ӡоw:косьба_травы_юган
wарх̌дор:возчик_югана
wарх̌дор:тот
wарх̌ин:трава_югана
wархато:рассеянность
wарӣҷ:невспаханные_места_на_пашне
wасwос:искушение
wасийат:завет
wасийат:мечта
wасиқā:документ
wасли:присоединение
wасф:восхваление
wасӣйат:завет
wасӣйат:мечта
wасӣйат:завет
wасӣлā:существование
wасӣқā:документ
wатан:родина
wатан:родина
wатандор:земляк
wатандор:местный_житель
wатандӯст:патриот
wатандӯсти:патриотизм
wафо:верность
wафо:верность
wафодори:верность
wафот:кончина
wахwо:сырость
wах̌ā:всякая_трава
wахаҷен:ваханец
wахеҷ:ваханец
wахеҷ:ваханец
wахеҷен:ваханец
wахт:время
wахт:время
wағɣаст:восклицание
wағғаст:визг
wақ-wақ:пение
wақт:время
wеδд:укладка
wебак:вязанка
wед:верба
wед:ива
wеру̊нā:развалины
wеру̊нā:хижина
wеру̊нā:развалины
wеру̊нги:разрушение
wеру̊нкор:разрушитель
wеру̊нкори:разрушение
wеф:вариант_косв_формы_мн_ч_указ_мест_wев
wехак-wох̌:название_травы
wеӡор:место
wи-рӯйā:та_сторона
wиɣ̌ас:шум
wиɣ̌аст:шум
wи́л-wи́л:шепот
wи́т-wи́т:звуки
wи́т-wи́т:шепот
wиδêд:пядь
wиδêд:четверть
wиδêд-δāδӣҷ:тот
wиδêц:отверстие_в_стене_для_воды
wиδêц:отверстие_в_стене_для_прохода_арыка
wиδич:воробей
wиδич:охрана_посевов_от_птиц
wиδич:мелкая_птица
wиδич-пидwӣн:охрана_посевов_от_птиц
wиδичак:воробышек
wиδичак:мелкая_птица
wиδичбу̊н:тот
wиδичбу̊ни:охрана_посевов_от_птиц
wиδичбу̊ни:охрана_посевов_от_птиц
wиδм:мята_лесная
wиδор:холм
wиδу̊м:потолок
wиδу̊м:потолок
wиδумч:валик_шерсти
wиδумчак:валик_шерсти
wиδӯмч:валик_шерсти
wиδӯмчак:валик_шерсти
wидоб:время_после_восхода_солнца
wидоб:время_после_восхода_солнца
wидобак:время_после_восхода_солнца
wидобак:время_после_восхода_солнца
wидобаки:время_после_восхода_солнца
wиду̊г:мирикария_лисохвостниковая
wиду̊гзор:заросли_мирикарии
wизêwӣҷ:огнетушитель
wизêwӣҷ:тот
wизенчоз:знаток
wизу̊нӣҷ:знающий
wийêш:корень
wийêш:основание
wийêш:корень
wийêш:корень
wийêшк:корень
wийêшк:основание
wийоw:шаг
wийӣн:встреча
wийӣх̌ц:тенистое_место
wилêх:корень
wилêх:пожитки
wилāмбӣҷак:кошмар
wилаw:транспортировка
wилаw:наемное_транспортное_животное
wилаw:подвода
wилаwдор:погонщик_вьючных_животных
wилдуб:пламя
wилич:терпение
wилойат:страна
wилойат:страна
wилоғ:вьючное_животное
wилоғ:вьючное_транспортное_животное
wилоғдор:тот
wилоғдори:коневодство
wилу̊м:груз
wилу̊хч:невысушенный_сыр
wилу̊хч:невысушенный_сыр
wилу̊хч-х̌ац:молочная_сыворотка
wилунгā:пламя
wилчак:мера
wилчаки:измерение
wилӡêх̌:неясный_шум
wиниӡ:видение
wиноғ:пряжа
wиноғ:шерсть_для_ниток
wинӣр:кормушка_для_скота
wинӣр:ясли
wинӣрак:кормушка_для_скота
wирāфциӡ:стояние
wирȥин:волк
wирембӣҷ:тот
wирих̌ӣҷ:тот
wирн:нехолощеный
wирни:способность_баранапроизводителя
wироw:пробор
wироw:пробор
wиру̊ғ:жар
wиру̊ӡӣҷ:тот
wируйаги:иностранец
wирус:русский
wирҷӯндак:повилика
wирӡwêх̌:шум
wирӡин:волчиха
wирӣҷ:невспаханное_место_между_бороздами
wирӯйҷ:распоротое_место
wисêрн:большой_глиняный_сосуд
wисêрн:большой_глиняный_горшок
wисйат:завет
wисйат:мечта
wискӯн:вилы
wискӯнд:вилы
wискӯнд:деревянные_вилы
wиспӯн:плотина
wиспӯнд:плотина
wиспӯнд:клубок_грубой_шерсти
wиспӯнд:плотина
wисто:кузнец
wисто:мастер
wистоδ:кузнец
wистоδ:мастер
wистоδ:мастер
wистоδак:кузнец
wистоδи:мастерство
wистол:стол
wистохи:своеволие
wисӯл:кокетство
wит-wит:звуки
wитохи:мера_измерения_масла
wитохиду̊н:сосуд
wитӯк:утюг
wих̌аwӣҷ:тот
wих̌аɣ̌ӣҷ:тот
wих̌ийӣҷ:тот
wих̌камбиӡ:переборка
wих̌камбӣҷ:тот
wих̌кирӣҷ:деревянная_кочерга
wих̌кирӣҷ:деревянная_кочерга
wих̌кӣмц:комочек_выделанной_шерсти
wих̌кӣмц:крупные_хлопья_снега
wих̌кӣмц:выделанная_шерсть
wих̌кӣмцак:комочек_шерсти
wих̌кӣмцак:снежные_хлопья
wих̌так:запеленатый_ребенок
wих̌так:запеленутый
wих̌тен:сено
wих̌тен:сено
wих̌тен:сеновал
wих̌тен-δāδӣҷ:тот
wих̌тени:мелкий_рогатый_скот_для_убоя
wих̌тиц:ирга
wих̌тиц:род_кустарника
wих̌тицзор:заросли_кустарника_ирги
wих̌тицин:сделанный_из_wixtic
wих̌хӣр:жвачка
wих̌ч:подставка_для_котла
wих̌чêр:локоть
wих̌чêрн:локоть
wих̌чêрн:локоть
wих̌чак:подставка_для_котла
wих̌ӣȥ:ключ
wих̌ӣӡ:ключ
wих̌ӣӡак:ключик
wих̌ӣӡак:язычок
wих̌ӯɣ̌ҷ:гребень_ткацкого_станка
wих̌ӯɣ̌ҷ:гребень
wих̌ӯɣ̌ҷ:ткацкий_станок
wих̌ӯɣ̌ҷ:гребень
wихин:кровь
wихин:кровь
wицак:название_травы
wишwол:размешивание
wишwол:хлопоты
wишӣҷ:тот
wиӡинӣҷ:тот
wоwайло:волнение
wо́чир:очередь
wобастаги:зависимость
wойwилад:волнение
wойwили:волнение
wоймā:эпилепсия
wоймā:паника
wоймā:злой_дух
wоймадор:эпилептик
wолч:борозда
wолч:борозда
wор:пора
wорис:наследник
wорис:наследник
wорисдор:тот
wоситā:причина
wоситā:средство
wоскат:безрукавка
wоскат:жилет
wостā:условие
wох̌:трава
wох̌:трава
wох̌:трава
wох̌:трава
wох̌-нармā:мякина
wох̌-тāжӣҷ:возчик_сена
wох̌-цийӣҷ:косарь
wох̌-цоw:сенокос
wох̌-ӡоw:сенокос
wох̌зор:луг
wох̌хор:травоядный
wох̌ҷӣни:кормление_скота
wох̌ҷӣни:задавание_корма_скоту
wох̌ҷӣц:сеновал
wох̌ҷӣц:сенник
wохури:встреча
wоқийā:событие
wоқийā:случай
wу́ж-wу́ж:бурля
wу́жа-wу́ж:бурля
wу́з-wу́з:шевеление
wу́л-wу́л:шепот
wу́т-wу́т:звуки
wу́т-wу́т:шепот
wу́ц-wу́ц:ковыляние
wу̊йwилақ:волнение
wу̊йwили:волнение
wу̊йwилид:волнение
wу̊н:необработанная_шерсть
wу̊н:необработанная_шерсть
wу̊н-wу̊нак:лоскутья
wу̊н-wу̊нак:потемнение
wу̊н-х̌абӣӡ:палочка_для_взбивания_шерсти
wу̊н-х̌ебӣҷ:шерстебит
wу̊ғɣаст:громкие_рыдания
wу̊ғғаст:громкие_рыдания
wу̊қ:тошнота
wудā:долг
wудā:положение
wудадори:обязательство
wужāнак:название_насекомого
wужрā:келья
wужрā:келья
wужрā:странноприимный_дом
wужрадор:тот
wужрайен:келья
wужрайен:странноприимный_дом
wуз:прямая_форма_личн_мест_го_л_ед_ч_я
wузбак:узбек
wузбак:узбек
wузик:прямая_форма_личн_мест_го_л_ед_ч_я
wузнā:припасы
wузна-йосӣҷ:доставщик_продуктов_летовщицам
wузнайеҷ:продукты_питания
wуичак:мера
wулwулок:название_мелкой_степной_птицы
wулар:спячка
wулкāн:вулкан
wулфат:имя_собств_муж_и_жен_или_его_компонент
wулфат:тесная_дружба
wулфати:дружба
wулчāк:качели
wулчāк:люлька
wулчāк:качели
wулчāк-бêх̌т:качание_на_качелях
wулчāк-боз:мастерица_играть
wулчāк-боз:участница_игры_на_качелях
wулчāк-бози:качание_на_качелях
wулчāк-бози:качание_на_качелях
wулчāк-бозӣҷ:участница_игры_на_качелях
wулчак:мера
wулчаки:измерение
wулчаки:измерение
wулҷā:разграбление
wурɣ̌и:пламя
wурамā:войлочная_попона
wурамā:войлочная_попона
wурз-wурз:судороги
wурз-о-wурз:гвалт
wурзаст:дрожь
wурумā:войлочная_попона
wурус:русский
wурус:русский
wуруси:русский
wурчбиц:волчонок
wурҷ:волк
wурҷ:волк
wурҷ-бу̊ст:волчья_шкура
wурҷбуц:волчонок
wусто:кузнец
wусто:мастер
wустоδи:мастерство
wусӯл:кокетство
wух̌:внимание
wух̌:разум
wух̌йорги:бодрость_духа
wух̌йорги:ловкость
wух̌йорги:разумность
wух̌йори:бодрость_духа
wух̌йори:ловкость
wух̌йори:разумность
wухйоргари:разумность
wухйоргари:хитрость
wуценӣҷ:тот
wучот:учет
wуғ:огромное_количество
wуқ:тошнота
wуҷрā:келья
wӣ́т-wӣ́т:звуки
wӣ́т-wӣ́т:след
wӣδ:рукоятка
wӣδм:мята_лесная
wӣδн:мята_лесная
wӣз:груз
wӣз:тяжесть
wӣз:груз
wӣз-wилу̊м:груз
wӣз-ат-wилу̊м:груз
wӣз-кинӣҷ:грузчик
wӣз-тāжӣҷ:носильщик
wӣз-тāжӣҷ:перевозящий_груз
wӣз-тӣжд:перевозка_грузов
wӣзах̌:куча
wӣздор:носильщик
wӣрвҷин:вареный
wӣрм:нехолощеный
wӣрм:баранпроизводитель
wӣрми:способность_баранапроизводителя
wӣрн:нехолощеный
wӣрн:баранпроизводитель
wӣрни:способность_баранапроизводителя
wӣс:чучело_из_шкуры_теленка
wӣскӯнак:вилка
wӣскӯнак:маленькие_вилы
wӣскӯндак:вилка
wӣскӯндак:маленькие_вилы
wӣх̌ак:герань
wӣх̌ак:полынь_персидская
wӯwдум:семидневье
wӯɣ̌ҷ:почка
wӯɣ̌ҷ:почки
wӯвдум:семидневье
wӯрɣ̌:шерстяная_пряжа
wӯрɣ̌:шерстяная_пряжа
wӯрв:кипение
wӯрв:кипение
wӯрв-δếд:кипение
wӯрв-δếдак:кипение
wӯрҷ:волк
wӯрҷ:волк
wӯрҷ:волк
wӯрҷ-бу̊ст:волчья_шкура
wӯрҷ-куд:волкообразная_собака
wӯрҷбиц:волчонок
wӯрҷбуц:волчонок
wӯс:основная_поперечная_балка
wӯс:балка
wӯсеҷ:бревно_для_балки
êзуми:штаны
āwаст:возглас
āwаст:восклицание
āwгӯст:август
āwгӯст:август
āwоз:голос
āwоз:право_голоса
āwозā:слух
āwол:положение
āwол:положение
āwол-пех̌цт:взаимные_расспросы_о_жизни
āwол-пурси:взаимные_расспросы_о_жизни
āwол-пурси:взаимные_расспросы_о_здоровье
āwолот:положение
āwрӯпо:европа
āwрӯпо:европа
ā́wрӯпо:европа
āд:соглашение
āд:граница
āд:договор
āдрис:адрес
āзо:член
āзо:член
āзо:член
āзоги:членство
āзоги:членство
āйд:праздник
āкс:испуг
āкс:отражение
āкт:акт
āкц:испуг
āкц:отражение
āл:растворение
āл:решение
āл-аwлод:родственники
āл-ат:родственники
āл-ат-аwол:положение
āлгебра:алгебра
āлгибра:алгебра
āли:население
āли:народ
āлоху̊н:отличник
āлочи:отличник
āлу̊н:объявление
āлу̊н:объявление
āмақ:дурак
āмақ:дурень
āмақгари:глупость
āмақи:глупость
āмийат:значение
āмийат:значение
āрмийа:армия
āтибор:надежда
āтибори:надежда
āту̊м:атом
āхта-ху̊нā:конюшня
āҷ:паломничество
ȥақах̌:переживание
ɣ̌êӡ:жар
ɣ̌āж:альпийская_галка
ɣ̌āжен:альпийская_галка
ɣ̌āжхел:альпийская_галка
ɣ̌āҷ:альпийская_галка
ɣ̌āҷен:альпийская_галка
ɣ̌āҷхел:альпийская_галка
ɣ̌аwӣҷ:ушко_сосуда
ɣ̌а́л-ɣ̌а́л:лязг
ɣ̌ач:сырые_прутья
ɣ̌еw:охота
ɣ̌еw-чӯɣ̌ҷин:охотничья_добыча
ɣ̌еwгāр:охотник
ɣ̌еwгар:охотник
ɣ̌еwдоҷ:охотник
ɣ̌имегак:ком
ɣ̌иму̊ӡиҷ:тот
ɣ̌ин:жена
ɣ̌инêрӡ:жена
ɣ̌инак:жнушка
ɣ̌инбиц:жнушка
ɣ̌индори:обязанности_жены
ɣ̌индӯст:женолюб
ɣ̌индӯсти:женолюбие
ɣ̌инен:жена
ɣ̌инеӡ:невеста
ɣ̌иник:женщина
ɣ̌иник:любовница
ɣ̌иникдори:наличие_любовницы
ɣ̌инӡел:цепь
ɣ̌инӡелак:цепочка
ɣ̌инӣд:род_черной_смородины
ɣ̌инӣӡор:заросли_черной_смородины
ɣ̌ол:бубенчик
ɣ̌ув:гной
ɣ̌ув:грязь
ɣ̌ув:смола
ɣ̌ӣш-ɣ̌ӣш:лай
δêwг:куница
δêɣ̌:куница
δêɣ̌:куница
δêɣ̌г:куница
δêɣ̌д:куница
δêɣ̌з:береза
δêɣ̌зн:береза
δêɣ̌зн:береза
δêɣ̌ӡ:береза
δêɣ̌ӡн:береза
δêб-wох̌:название_травы
δêд:война
δêд:спор
δêд:война
δêд-wеδӣҷ:подстрекатель
δêд-чӣд:драка
δêдак:сост_часть_сложных_слов
δêдгар:драчун
δêдгар:боевой
δêдманд:драчун
δêрв:серп
δêрв:серп
δêрв-х̌оп:косьба_травы_с_помощью_серпа
δêрмāнд:неуклюжий
δêсак:глицерия
δêсак:костер
δêсак:овес
δêсак:овсюг
δêсак:овсюг
δêсак-wох̌:трава
δакиӡ:вылизывание
δакӣҷ:лизун
δакӣҷ:сост_часть_сложных_слов_с_тем_же_значением
δакӣҷ:лизун
